Maryland, session 2025, SB0112.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
3–203.
(a) A person may not commit an assault.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0112*

SENATE BILL 112
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a person who violates
subsection (a) of this section is guilty of the misdemeanor of assault in the second degree
and on conviction is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding
$2,500 or both.
(c) (1) In this subsection, “physical injury” means any impairment of physical
condition, excluding minor injuries.
(2) A person may not intentionally cause physical injury to another if the
person knows or has reason to know that the other is:
(i) a law enforcement officer engaged in the performance of the
officer’s official duties;
(ii) a parole or probation agent engaged in the performance of the
agent’s official duties; [or]
(iii) a firefighter, an emergency medical technician, a rescue squad
member, or any other first responder engaged in providing emergency medical care or
rescue services; OR
(IV) AN OFFICIAL, AN UMPIRE, A REFEREE, OR A JUDGE WHO IS
OFFICIATING AT A SPORTING EVENT.
(3) (I) A person who violates paragraph [(2)] (2)(I), (II), OR (III) of this
subsection is guilty of the felony of assault in the second degree and on conviction is subject
to imprisonment not exceeding 10 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.
(II) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES PARAGRAPH (2)(IV) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS GUILTY OF THE MISDEMEANOR OF ASSAULT IN THE SECOND DEGREE
AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO IMPRISONMENT NOT EXCEEDING 10 YEARS OR
A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $2,500 OR BOTH.
Article – Criminal Procedure
2–203.
(a) A police officer without a warrant may arrest a person if the police officer has
probable cause to believe:
(1) that the person has committed a crime listed in subsection (b) of this
section; and
(2) that unless the person is arrested immediately, the person:

SENATE BILL 112 3
(i) may not be apprehended;
(ii) may cause physical injury or property damage to another; or
(iii) may tamper with, dispose of, or destroy evidence.
(b) The crimes referred to in subsection (a)(1) of this section are:
(1) manslaughter by vehicle or vessel under § 2–209 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(2) malicious burning under § 6–104 or § 6–105 of the Criminal Law Article
or an attempt to commit the crime;
(3) malicious mischief under § 6–301 of the Criminal Law Article or an
attempt to commit the crime;
(4) a theft crime where the value of the property or services stolen is less
than $1,000 under § 7–104 or § 7–105 of the Criminal Law Article or an attempt to commit
the crime;
(5) the crime of giving or causing to be given a false alarm of fire under §
9–604 of the Criminal Law Article;
(6) indecent exposure under § 11–107 of the Criminal Law Article;
(7) a crime that relates to controlled dangerous substances under Title 5 of
the Criminal Law Article or an attempt to commit the crime;
(8) the wearing, carrying, or transporting of a handgun under § 4–203 or §
4–204 of the Criminal Law Article;
(9) carrying or wearing a concealed weapon under § 4–101 of the Criminal
Law Article;
(10) prostitution and related crimes under Title 11, Subtitle 3 of the
Criminal Law Article; [and]
(11) violation of a condition of pretrial or posttrial release under § 5–213.1
of this article; AND
(12) ASSAULT IN THE SECOND DEGREE UNDER § 3–203(C)(2)(IV) OF
THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.